Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.900

Certain certificated employees exempt from chapter provisions.

Certificated employees subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.310.250, 28A.405.100, 28A.405.210, and 28A.405.220 shall not include those certificated employees hired to replace certificated employees who have been granted sabbatical, regular, or other leave by school districts, and shall not include retirees hired for postretirement employment under the provisions of chapter 10, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

It is not the intention of the legislature that this section apply to any regularly hired certificated employee or that the legal or constitutional rights of such employee be limited, abridged, or abrogated.

[ 2002 c 26 s 1; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 2; 1990 c 33 s 404; 1972 ex.s. c 142 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.67.900.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 10: See note following RCW 41.40.037.

Postretirement employment under the teachers' retirement system: RCW 41.32.570.